Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.30
Appeal; procedure.

An order of the commission which has become final may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 30;

Laws 1981, LB 238, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 169.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Action by Real Estate Commission to suspend license is arbitrary and capricious where it is taken on findings of fact that do not represent a breach of conduct within the terms of the statute. Judicial review of a commission order issued before the effective date of the 1981 amendment to this section is under the amendment, where district court acted on the appeal after the amendment took effect. Hancock v. State ex rel. Real Estate Comm., 213 Neb. 807, 331 N.W.2d 526 (1983).